be_BY/be-official.aff
# Belarusian Spellchecker Dictionary for official orthography 2008
#
# Dictionary based on Belarusian Grammar Database (https://bnkorpus.info/grammar.html)
# by Aleś Bułojčyk <alex73mail@gmail.com> and Uładzimir Koščanka <koshul@gmail.com>
#
# License:  CC BY-SA 4.0
#
SET UTF-8
TRY йцукенгшўзх'фывапролджэячсмітьбюёЁЙЦУКЕНГШЎЗХФЫВАПРОЛДЖЭЯЧСМІТЬБЮ
WORDCHARS '
FLAG num
SFX 2838 Y 1
SFX 2838 0 анеш .
SFX 669 Y 1
SFX 669 0 шым .
SFX 825 Y 1
SFX 825 0 ва .
SFX 1374 Y 1
SFX 1374 0 ве .
SFX 902 Y 1
SFX 902 0 альнымі .
SFX 4135 Y 1
SFX 4135 0 цыйнымі .
SFX 4862 Y 1
SFX 4862 0 аграфічнага .
SFX 1668 Y 1
SFX 1668 0 вальную .
SFX 887 Y 1
SFX 887 0 лівым .
SFX 4819 Y 1
SFX 4819 0 іроўкай .
SFX 901 Y 1
SFX 901 0 альных .
SFX 900 Y 1
SFX 900 0 альныя .
SFX 4482 Y 1
SFX 4482 0 едам .
SFX 104 Y 1
SFX 104 0 авых .
SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 0 авыя .
SFX 575 Y 1
SFX 575 0 ьную .
SFX 2168 Y 1
SFX 2168 0 алогію .
SFX 2167 Y 1
SFX 2167 0 алогія .
SFX 2169 Y 1
SFX 2169 0 алогіі .
SFX 3402 Y 1
SFX 3402 0 піць .
SFX 4730 Y 1
SFX 4730 0 чваемся .
SFX 4984 Y 1
SFX 4984 0 льскі .
SFX 4096 Y 1
SFX 4096 0 даюць .
SFX 3081 Y 1
SFX 3081 0 шыць .
SFX 3660 Y 1
SFX 3660 0 алам .
SFX 1490 Y 1
SFX 1490 0 чана .
SFX 1751 Y 1
SFX 1751 0 нічаем .
SFX 4946 Y 1
SFX 4946 0 рнасць .
SFX 4945 Y 1
SFX 4945 0 рнасцю .
SFX 4947 Y 1
SFX 4947 0 рнасці .
SFX 619 Y 1
SFX 619 0 аваных .
SFX 618 Y 1
SFX 618 0 аваныя .
SFX 4928 Y 1
SFX 4928 0 хваючы .
SFX 1336 Y 1
SFX 1336 0 лівасць .
SFX 1335 Y 1
SFX 1335 0 лівасцю .
SFX 1337 Y 1
SFX 1337 0 лівасці .
SFX 2556 Y 1
SFX 2556 0 шанага .
SFX 513 Y 1
SFX 513 0 шчыкамі .
SFX 4791 Y 1
SFX 4791 0 маўшы .
SFX 529 Y 1
SFX 529 0 оваму .
SFX 1662 Y 1
SFX 1662 0 руючы .
SFX 3924 Y 1
SFX 3924 0 графічнае .
SFX 3923 Y 1
SFX 3923 0 графічнай .
SFX 2111 Y 1
SFX 2111 0 рскім .
SFX 212 Y 1
SFX 212 0 анага .
SFX 1114 Y 1
SFX 1114 0 енаю .
SFX 1113 Y 1
SFX 1113 0 еная .
SFX 3297 Y 1
SFX 3297 0 паеце .
SFX 2655 Y 1
SFX 2655 0 шкай .
SFX 2544 Y 1
SFX 2544 0 шкам .
SFX 3722 Y 1
SFX 3722 0 сьці .
SFX 4347 Y 1
SFX 4347 0 бяць .
SFX 2673 Y 1
SFX 2673 0 тцы .
SFX 2305 Y 1
SFX 2305 0 ака .
SFX 2537 Y 1
SFX 2537 0 залі .
SFX 3478 Y 1
SFX 3478 0 графію .
SFX 3477 Y 1
SFX 3477 0 графія .
SFX 3479 Y 1
SFX 3479 0 графіі .
SFX 4834 Y 1
SFX 4834 0 годдзям .
SFX 4506 Y 1
SFX 4506 0 астымі .
SFX 4269 Y 1
SFX 4269 0 унамі .
SFX 1355 Y 1
SFX 1355 0 яце .
SFX 1466 Y 1
SFX 1466 0 чанае .
SFX 1465 Y 1
SFX 1465 0 чанай .
SFX 3935 Y 1
SFX 3935 0 аграфію .
SFX 3934 Y 1
SFX 3934 0 аграфія .
SFX 3936 Y 1
SFX 3936 0 аграфіі .
SFX 833 Y 1
SFX 833 0 ымі .
SFX 4222 Y 1
SFX 4222 0 бай .
SFX 3059 Y 1
SFX 3059 0 бам .
SFX 53 Y 1
SFX 53 0 нага .
SFX 4618 Y 1
SFX 4618 0 куюць .
SFX 3335 Y 1
SFX 3335 0 заванаму .
SFX 4330 Y 1
SFX 4330 0 галовым .
SFX 1549 Y 1
SFX 1549 0 жана .
SFX 2543 Y 1
SFX 2543 0 шкамі .
SFX 1951 Y 1
SFX 1951 0 ляемся .
SFX 605 Y 1
SFX 605 0 ецеся .
SFX 3792 Y 1
SFX 3792 0 арскімі .
SFX 4747 Y 1
SFX 4747 0 рысты .
SFX 324 Y 1
SFX 324 0 анню .
SFX 328 Y 1
SFX 328 0 ання .
SFX 327 Y 1
SFX 327 0 анні .
SFX 2223 Y 1
SFX 2223 0 лося .
SFX 64 Y 1
SFX 64 0 ка .
SFX 4106 Y 1
SFX 4106 0 віну .
SFX 4219 Y 1
SFX 4219 0 віны .
SFX 604 Y 1
SFX 604 0 іўшы .
SFX 555 Y 1
SFX 555 0 р .
SFX 1161 Y 1
SFX 1161 0 с .
SFX 388 Y 1
SFX 388 0 т .
SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 0 у .
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 0 х .
SFX 695 Y 1
SFX 695 0 ц .
SFX 1365 Y 1
SFX 1365 0 ч .
SFX 16 Y 1
SFX 16 0 ш .
SFX 24 Y 1
SFX 24 0 ы .
SFX 549 Y 1
SFX 549 0 ь .
SFX 4872 Y 1
SFX 4872 0 э .
SFX 8 Y 1
SFX 8 0 ю .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 я .
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 і .
SFX 17 Y 1
SFX 17 0 ў .
SFX 440 Y 1
SFX 440 0 нула .
SFX 1321 Y 1
SFX 1321 0 аўскаю .
SFX 1277 Y 1
SFX 1277 0 аўская .
SFX 3527 Y 1
SFX 3527 0 оўвалі .
SFX 773 Y 1
SFX 773 0 шую .
SFX 3853 Y 1
SFX 3853 0 ствуюць .
SFX 1634 Y 1
SFX 1634 0 вальных .
SFX 1633 Y 1
SFX 1633 0 вальныя .
SFX 1960 Y 1
SFX 1960 0 ьваліся .
SFX 919 Y 1
SFX 919 0 альнае .
SFX 918 Y 1
SFX 918 0 альнай .
SFX 509 Y 1
SFX 509 0 аваўся .
SFX 4436 Y 1
SFX 4436 0 оўшчыцах .
SFX 4435 Y 1
SFX 4435 0 оўшчыцаю .
SFX 2063 Y 1
SFX 2063 0 зацыю .
SFX 2062 Y 1
SFX 2062 0 зацыя .
SFX 2064 Y 1
SFX 2064 0 зацыі .
SFX 74 Y 1
SFX 74 0 ках .
SFX 65 Y 1
SFX 65 0 каю .
SFX 360 Y 1
SFX 360 0 кая .
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 0 каў .
SFX 123 Y 1
SFX 123 0 авае .
SFX 121 Y 1
SFX 121 0 авай .
SFX 3354 Y 1
SFX 3354 0 авак .
SFX 898 Y 1
SFX 898 0 лівую .
SFX 3285 Y 1
SFX 3285 0 таваны .
SFX 3003 Y 1
SFX 3003 0 шчыцкаму .
SFX 590 Y 1
SFX 590 0 ьных .
SFX 589 Y 1
SFX 589 0 ьныя .
SFX 2360 Y 1
SFX 2360 0 іравалі .
SFX 1470 Y 1
SFX 1470 0 ўкай .
SFX 2131 Y 1
SFX 2131 0 ўкам .
SFX 3520 Y 1
SFX 3520 0 ствамі .
SFX 2680 Y 1
SFX 2680 0 овачным .
SFX 1826 Y 1
SFX 1826 0 ьвала .
SFX 2817 Y 1
SFX 2817 0 наваю .
SFX 2757 Y 1
SFX 2757 0 навая .
SFX 3355 Y 1
SFX 3355 0 ьвайцеся .
SFX 2202 Y 1
SFX 2202 0 сцкім .
SFX 796 Y 1
SFX 796 0 шымі .
SFX 2766 Y 1
SFX 2766 0 лісты .
SFX 627 Y 1
SFX 627 0 аванае .
SFX 626 Y 1
SFX 626 0 аванай .
SFX 2619 Y 1
SFX 2619 0 кнуць .
SFX 3933 Y 1
SFX 3933 0 аграфіяй .
SFX 531 Y 1
SFX 531 0 овага .
SFX 4126 Y 1
SFX 4126 0 чаюць .
SFX 4130 Y 1
SFX 4130 0 чаеш .
SFX 1011 Y 1
SFX 1011 0 кавым .
SFX 4085 Y 1
SFX 4085 0 ісе .
SFX 4686 Y 1
SFX 4686 0 будаванню .
SFX 4685 Y 1
SFX 4685 0 будавання .
SFX 4687 Y 1
SFX 4687 0 будаванні .
SFX 4989 Y 1
SFX 4989 0 льскае .
SFX 4988 Y 1
SFX 4988 0 льскай .
SFX 15 Y 1
SFX 15 0 цца .
SFX 2700 Y 1
SFX 2700 0 льшчыцамі .
SFX 3283 Y 1
SFX 3283 0 таванымі .
SFX 1890 Y 1
SFX 1890 0 ізм .
SFX 1278 Y 1
SFX 1278 0 раваць .
SFX 4888 Y 1
SFX 4888 0 чней .
SFX 4576 Y 1
SFX 4576 0 свае .
SFX 4572 Y 1
SFX 4572 0 свай .
SFX 4334 Y 1
SFX 4334 0 галоваму .
SFX 2894 Y 1
SFX 2894 0 анула .
SFX 1602 Y 1
SFX 1602 0 ліваўся .
SFX 1878 Y 1
SFX 1878 0 аву .
SFX 107 Y 1
SFX 107 0 авы .
SFX 2217 Y 1
SFX 2217 0 нутаю .
SFX 2216 Y 1
SFX 2216 0 нутая .
SFX 2715 Y 1
SFX 2715 0 ерны .
SFX 4147 Y 1
SFX 4147 0 ціну .
SFX 4920 Y 1
SFX 4920 0 ціны .
SFX 3357 Y 1
SFX 3357 0 ыха .
SFX 1394 Y 1
SFX 1394 0 ыкай .
SFX 1936 Y 1
SFX 1936 0 ыкам .
SFX 3316 Y 1
SFX 3316 0 зяце .
SFX 1131 Y 1
SFX 1131 0 калі .
SFX 3338 Y 1
SFX 3338 0 заванага .
SFX 3882 Y 1
SFX 3882 0 нала .
SFX 2980 Y 1
SFX 2980 0 аўкай .
SFX 3930 Y 1
SFX 3930 0 аўкам .
SFX 1115 Y 1
SFX 1115 0 енаму .
SFX 4201 Y 1
SFX 4201 0 йку .
SFX 4807 Y 1
SFX 4807 0 йкі .
SFX 781 Y 1
SFX 781 0 ачны .
SFX 4227 Y 1
SFX 4227 0 анце .
SFX 4798 Y 1
SFX 4798 0 ленасць .
SFX 4797 Y 1
SFX 4797 0 ленасцю .
SFX 4799 Y 1
SFX 4799 0 ленасці .
SFX 4331 Y 1
SFX 4331 0 галовую .
SFX 4827 Y 1
SFX 4827 0 жаеш .
SFX 3553 Y 1
SFX 3553 0 ітам .
SFX 2330 Y 1
SFX 2330 0 віце .
SFX 2074 Y 1
SFX 2074 0 чвалі .
SFX 3356 Y 1
SFX 3356 0 ьвайся .
SFX 795 Y 1
SFX 795 0 шых .
SFX 3365 Y 1
SFX 3365 0 шыш .
SFX 792 Y 1
SFX 792 0 шыя .
SFX 3366 Y 1
SFX 3366 0 шыў .
SFX 2189 Y 1
SFX 2189 0 авікам .
SFX 1672 Y 1
SFX 1672 0 вальнае .
SFX 1671 Y 1
SFX 1671 0 вальнай .
SFX 4877 Y 1
SFX 4877 0 шнаму .
SFX 850 Y 1
SFX 850 0 ву .
SFX 2966 Y 1
SFX 2966 0 зуючы .
SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 0 вы .
SFX 3781 Y 1
SFX 3781 0 ві .
SFX 2693 Y 1
SFX 2693 0 навымі .
SFX 557 Y 1
SFX 557 0 ніцай .
SFX 614 Y 1
SFX 614 0 ніцам .
SFX 4024 Y 1
SFX 4024 0 яецца .
SFX 3006 Y 1
SFX 3006 0 шчыцкага .
SFX 885 Y 1
SFX 885 0 лівых .
SFX 884 Y 1
SFX 884 0 лівыя .
SFX 598 Y 1
SFX 598 0 ьнае .
SFX 597 Y 1
SFX 597 0 ьнай .
SFX 4818 Y 1
SFX 4818 0 іроўкаю .
SFX 3724 Y 1
SFX 3724 0 саць .
SFX 1352 Y 1
SFX 1352 0 кайце .
SFX 2053 Y 1
SFX 2053 0 канне .
SFX 3470 Y 1
SFX 3470 0 ізаваў .
SFX 1819 Y 1
SFX 1819 0 дзіла .
SFX 4480 Y 1
SFX 4480 0 едах .
SFX 4318 Y 1
SFX 4318 0 едаў .
SFX 1181 Y 1
SFX 1181 0 ннымі .
SFX 4575 Y 1
SFX 4575 0 сваем .
SFX 2682 Y 1
SFX 2682 0 овачную .
SFX 4470 Y 1
SFX 4470 0 зне .
SFX 3712 Y 1
SFX 3712 0 хаецца .
SFX 4018 Y 1
SFX 4018 0 алах .
SFX 4693 Y 1
SFX 4693 0 алаў .
SFX 4189 Y 1
SFX 4189 0 люць .
SFX 1460 Y 1
SFX 1460 0 чаны .
SFX 1749 Y 1
SFX 1749 0 нічаеш .
SFX 1389 Y 1
SFX 1389 0 стасць .
SFX 1388 Y 1
SFX 1388 0 стасцю .
SFX 1390 Y 1
SFX 1390 0 стасці .
SFX 1024 Y 1
SFX 1024 0 кавую .
SFX 3921 Y 1
SFX 3921 0 графічнаю .
SFX 3920 Y 1
SFX 3920 0 графічная .
SFX 4337 Y 1
SFX 4337 0 галовага .
SFX 1808 Y 1
SFX 1808 0 раванымі .
SFX 2109 Y 1
SFX 2109 0 рскіх .
SFX 2108 Y 1
SFX 2108 0 рскія .
SFX 1408 Y 1
SFX 1408 0 ліваюць .
SFX 2517 Y 1
SFX 2517 0 шках .
SFX 2654 Y 1
SFX 2654 0 шкаю .
SFX 1638 Y 1
SFX 1638 0 вальнаму .
SFX 1927 Y 1
SFX 1927 0 аку .
SFX 2417 Y 1
SFX 2417 0 акі .
SFX 4831 Y 1
SFX 4831 0 годдзях .
SFX 4832 Y 1
SFX 4832 0 годдзяў .
SFX 224 Y 1
SFX 224 0 ыла .
SFX 270 Y 1
SFX 270 0 яць .
SFX 1118 Y 1
SFX 1118 0 енага .
SFX 945 Y 1
SFX 945 0 нка .
SFX 1463 Y 1
SFX 1463 0 чанаю .
SFX 1462 Y 1
SFX 1462 0 чаная .
SFX 871 Y 1
SFX 871 0 чка .
SFX 3183 Y 1
SFX 3183 0 нскую .
SFX 2322 Y 1
SFX 2322 0 раеце .
SFX 3143 Y 1
SFX 3143 0 бах .
SFX 4010 Y 1
SFX 4010 0 баю .
SFX 3349 Y 1
SFX 3349 0 баў .
SFX 4993 Y 1
SFX 4993 0 льнямі .
SFX 4328 Y 1
SFX 4328 0 галовых .
SFX 4327 Y 1
SFX 4327 0 галовыя .
SFX 1499 Y 1
SFX 1499 0 жаны .
SFX 999 Y 1
SFX 999 0 шчыцай .
SFX 998 Y 1
SFX 998 0 шчыцам .
SFX 4743 Y 1
SFX 4743 0 тавалася .
SFX 2156 Y 1
SFX 2156 0 істка .
SFX 3449 Y 1
SFX 3449 0 ісцкую .
SFX 4034 Y 1
SFX 4034 0 шваеце .
SFX 584 Y 1
SFX 584 0 ычнаму .
SFX 2191 Y 1
SFX 2191 0 чваючы .
SFX 4880 Y 1
SFX 4880 0 шнага .
SFX 766 Y 1
SFX 766 0 шае .
SFX 725 Y 1
SFX 725 0 шай .
SFX 2800 Y 1
SFX 2800 0 шак .
SFX 1997 Y 1
SFX 1997 0 шам .
SFX 1243 Y 1
SFX 1243 0 ленне .
SFX 1658 Y 1
SFX 1658 0 чыцай .
SFX 1657 Y 1
SFX 1657 0 чыцам .
SFX 2636 Y 1
SFX 2636 0 вод .
SFX 942 Y 1
SFX 942 0 вое .
SFX 4340 Y 1
SFX 4340 0 воз .
SFX 862 Y 1
SFX 862 0 вой .
SFX 63 Y 1
SFX 63 0 ку .
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 0 кі .
SFX 3063 Y 1
SFX 3063 0 яўся .
SFX 2147 Y 1
SFX 2147 0 льшчык .
SFX 439 Y 1
SFX 439 0 нулі .
SFX 4437 Y 1
SFX 4437 0 оўшчыцамі .
SFX 1532 Y 1
SFX 1532 0 ніцкаму .
SFX 548 Y 1
SFX 548 0 лівае .
SFX 562 Y 1
SFX 562 0 лівай .
SFX 2112 Y 1
SFX 2112 0 рскі .
SFX 3587 Y 1
SFX 3587 0 ыўнаму .
SFX 917 Y 1
SFX 917 0 альнаю .
SFX 916 Y 1
SFX 916 0 альная .
SFX 1613 Y 1
SFX 1613 0 самі .
SFX 4502 Y 1
SFX 4502 0 вальшчыкам .
SFX 859 Y 1
SFX 859 0 падобнымі .
SFX 122 Y 1
SFX 122 0 аваю .
SFX 113 Y 1
SFX 113 0 авая .
SFX 320 Y 1
SFX 320 0 аваў .
SFX 2129 Y 1
SFX 2129 0 ўках .
SFX 1469 Y 1
SFX 1469 0 ўкаю .
SFX 3496 Y 1
SFX 3496 0 шыла .
SFX 2678 Y 1
SFX 2678 0 овачных .
SFX 2677 Y 1
SFX 2677 0 овачныя .
SFX 1825 Y 1
SFX 1825 0 ьвалі .
SFX 2296 Y 1
SFX 2296 0 жваць .
SFX 3071 Y 1
SFX 3071 0 ьваешся .
SFX 128 Y 1
SFX 128 0 ўшыся .
SFX 2746 Y 1
SFX 2746 0 чаце .
SFX 2234 Y 1
SFX 2234 0 авальнаму .
SFX 3441 Y 1
SFX 3441 0 лагічны .
SFX 3429 Y 1
SFX 3429 0 ліне .
SFX 1159 Y 1
SFX 1159 0 нкай .
SFX 932 Y 1
SFX 932 0 нкам .
SFX 2200 Y 1
SFX 2200 0 сцкіх .
SFX 2199 Y 1
SFX 2199 0 сцкія .
SFX 2824 Y 1
SFX 2824 0 зеш .
SFX 448 Y 1
SFX 448 0 ылася .
SFX 624 Y 1
SFX 624 0 аванаю .
SFX 623 Y 1
SFX 623 0 аваная .
SFX 3932 Y 1
SFX 3932 0 аграфіяю .
SFX 1943 Y 1
SFX 1943 0 цім .
SFX 4343 Y 1
SFX 4343 0 вінай .
SFX 1009 Y 1
SFX 1009 0 кавых .
SFX 1018 Y 1
SFX 1018 0 кавыя .
SFX 3095 Y 1
SFX 3095 0 тарамі .
SFX 1348 Y 1
SFX 1348 0 іст .
SFX 1040 Y 1
SFX 1040 0 іся .
SFX 1491 Y 1
SFX 1491 0 ціце .
SFX 4580 Y 1
SFX 4580 0 рствам .
SFX 3522 Y 1
SFX 3522 0 пайце .
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 ваецца .
SFX 4986 Y 1
SFX 4986 0 льскаю .
SFX 4985 Y 1
SFX 4985 0 льская .
SFX 2828 Y 1
SFX 2828 0 жвацца .
SFX 4677 Y 1
SFX 4677 0 дка .
SFX 1639 Y 1
SFX 1639 0 вальнага .
SFX 4566 Y 1
SFX 4566 0 сваю .
SFX 4568 Y 1
SFX 4568 0 сваў .
SFX 2595 Y 1
SFX 2595 0 віком .
SFX 3569 Y 1
SFX 3569 0 ацыйнаму .
SFX 2893 Y 1
SFX 2893 0 анулі .
SFX 3794 Y 1
SFX 3794 0 арскі .
SFX 3146 Y 1
SFX 3146 0 ыху .
SFX 3239 Y 1
SFX 3239 0 ыхі .
SFX 4479 Y 1
SFX 4479 0 ета .
SFX 1216 Y 1
SFX 1216 0 ямі .
SFX 1963 Y 1
SFX 1963 0 ыках .
SFX 1387 Y 1
SFX 1387 0 ыкаю .
SFX 2025 Y 1
SFX 2025 0 ыкаў .
SFX 2872 Y 1
SFX 2872 0 онам .
SFX 4009 Y 1
SFX 4009 0 гаць .
SFX 1019 Y 1
SFX 1019 0 зяць .
SFX 3916 Y 1
SFX 3916 0 графічнымі .
SFX 4187 Y 1
SFX 4187 0 налі .
SFX 4336 Y 1
SFX 4336 0 галовае .
SFX 4335 Y 1
SFX 4335 0 галовай .
SFX 1949 Y 1
SFX 1949 0 ляючыся .
